Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions
37-2-5.2.
Local offices — Duties, functions, and powers.

Under the supervision of the department, each local office shall have the following duties and functions:

To receive and administer gifts, moneys, and donations for purposes pertaining to mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease services;

To encourage the development, in cooperation with the department, of private and public providers of programs and disability services which respond to the needs of consumers and families of consumers within the region;

To serve as the representative of the citizens of the area in regard to disability services;

To receive and consider complaints and grievances submitted by individuals, associations, or agencies involved with the delivery or receipt of disability services and, if deemed appropriate, to seek resolution in coordination with the department, through
processes which may include impartial mediation and alternative dispute resolution, of such complaints and grievances with the appropriate hospital, community service board, or other private or public provider of service;

To assure the highest achievable level of public awareness and understanding of both available and needed disability services;

To visit regularly disability services facilities and programs which serve the region in order to assure contracted providers are licensed and accredited by the designated agencies prescribed by the department, and in order to evaluate the effectiveness
and appropriateness of the services, as such services relate to the health, safety, and welfare of service recipients, and to provide technical assistance to programs in delivering services; and

To participate with other local offices and planning boards, the department, local, state, or federal government agencies, educational institutions, and public and private organizations in the coordination of planning, research, service development, and
evaluation activities:

To work cooperatively with all units of county and local government, including the county boards of health, within the region; and

To establish goals and objectives, not inconsistent with those established by the department, for its region.

History. Code 1981, §

37-2-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 7/SB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1361, § 5/HB 512.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which enacts this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that this Code section is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would
have repealed this Code section.

37-2-6.
Community mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases service boards — Community service board creation; membership; participation of counties; transfer of powers and duties; alternate method of establishment; bylaws; reprisals prohibited.

Community service boards in existence on June 30, 2014, are re-created effective July 1, 2014, to provide mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases services to children and adults. Such community service boards may enroll and contract
with the department, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, or the Department of Community Health to become a provider of mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases services or
health, recovery, housing, or other supportive services for children and adults. Such boards shall be considered public agencies. Each community service board shall be a public corporation and an instrumentality of the state; provided,
however, that the liabilities, debts, and obligations of a community service board shall not constitute liabilities, debts, or obligations of the state or any county or municipal corporation and neither the state nor any county
or municipal corporation shall be liable for any liability, debt, or obligation of a community service board. Each community service board re-created pursuant to this Code section is created for nonprofit and public purposes to
exercise essential governmental functions. The re-creation of community service boards pursuant to this Code section shall not alter the provisions of Code Section 37-2-6.2 which shall apply to those re-created community service
boards and their employees covered by that Code section and those employees’ rights are retained.

The governing board of each community service board shall consist of members appointed by the governing authorities of the counties within the community service board area. Membership on such governing board shall be determined as follows:

The governing authority of each county within the community service board area:

With a population of 50,000 or less according to the most recent United States decennial census shall appoint one member to such governing board; and

With a population of more than 50,000 according to the most recent United States decennial census shall appoint one member for each population increment of 50,000 or any portion thereof; or

In the event that the number of governing board member positions established in accordance with subparagraph (A) of this paragraph would exceed nine, the membership of such governing board pursuant to this subsection shall be appointed as follows and
the bylaws shall be amended accordingly:

For community service boards whose community service board area contains nine or fewer counties, the membership of the board shall be set at nine members and appointments to the board shall be made by the governing authority of each county within the
community service board area in descending order from the county with the largest population to the county with the smallest population according to the most recent United States decennial census and this
method shall be repeated until all nine members of the governing board of the community service board are appointed. If a county governing authority fails to make an appointment within a reasonable time,
the next descending county by population shall make an appointment and the method shall continue; and

For community service boards whose community service board area contains more than nine counties, one member of the governing board of the community service board shall be appointed by the governing authority of each county within the community service
board area, so that the number of members on the governing board is equal to the number of counties in the community service board area.

The county governing authority shall appoint as at least one of its appointments a consumer of disability services; a psychiatrist, a psychologist, or other behavioral health or development disabilities professional; a law enforcement officer; a family
member of a consumer; an advocate for disability services; a parent of a child with mental illness or addictive disease; or a local leader or businessperson with an interest in mental health, developmental
disabilities, and addictive diseases; provided, however, that for counties with more than one appointment, the county governing authority shall seek to ensure that such appointments represent various
groups and disability services;

In addition to the members appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the governing board of each community service board may appoint one additional member in order to address variation in the population sizes of counties or the financial
contributions of counties within the community service board area. The bylaws of the community service board shall address the establishment of the additional governing board membership position, if established, and the
purpose or purposes for which such position is created. The term of office of such additional member shall be the same as that of other members of the governing board of the community service board as provided in subsection
(h) of this Code section;

In addition to the members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, each governing board of a community service board shall have additional members who shall serve on such governing board while concurrently holding elective or
appointive office and who shall be appointed by a county governing authority as follows:

The number of elected or appointed officials serving on the governing board of a community service board shall be equal to one-third, defined herein as 33 percent or 0.33, of the number of the members of such board appointed in accordance with paragraph
(1) of this subsection. In the event the calculation of such percentage yields a whole number and a fraction of a whole number, then the number of members to be appointed shall be equal to the nearest whole number;
however, a fraction equal to 50 percent or greater shall be rounded to the next highest whole number;

The governing authority of each county in the community service board area making the largest cash or in-kind financial contribution in descending order to the community service board in the county fiscal year immediately prior to the time of such appointment
shall make one appointment of an elected or appointed official to the community service board until the number of such appointments required by this paragraph is reached. For community service boards whose community
service board areas contains fewer counties than the number of appointments made pursuant to this paragraph, the membership appointments of elected or appointed officials to the governing board shall be made in
the descending order prescribed in this paragraph and this method shall be repeated until all members who hold elective or appointive office are appointed to the governing board of the community service board. In
the event that the number of such county governing authorities making a cash or in-kind financial contribution to the community service board does not result in the number of appointments required by this paragraph,
the remaining appointment or appointments shall be made by the governing authority or authorities of the county or counties in the community service board area with the largest population in descending order according
to the most recent United States decennial census until the number of appointments required by this paragraph is reached. For community service boards whose community service board area contains three or fewer counties,
the membership appointments of elected or appointed officials to the governing board shall be made in the descending order prescribed in this paragraph and this method shall be repeated until all members who hold
elective or appointive office are appointed to the governing board of the community service board. In the event there is no county in the community service board area where the governing authority made a cash or
in-kind financial contribution to the community service board in the county fiscal year immediately prior to the time of such appointment, the appointments required by this paragraph shall be made by the governing
authority or authorities of the county or counties in the community service board area with the largest population in descending order according to the most recent United States decennial census until the number
of appointments required by this paragraph is reached;

As used in this paragraph, the term “elective or appointive office” or “elected or appointed official” means:

The elected chief executive officer, by whatever name called, of the county governing authority making the appointment to the governing board of the community service board;

An elected member of such county governing authority;

The county manager of such county governing authority where such position exists as defined in Code Section 36-5-22;

The sheriff of such county;

The elected chief executive officer, by whatever named called, an elected member of the governing authority, or an appointed city manager of any municipality lying wholly or partially within such county;

A member of the board of education of such county or a member of the governing board of any municipal school system lying wholly or partially within such county;

The school superintendent of such county or the superintendent of any municipal school system lying wholly or partially within such county;

The appointed public safety commissioner, police chief, or fire chief of such county or any municipality lying wholly or partially within such county; or

Any other elected official from within such county;

No member of the governing board of the community service board appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall continue to serve on the governing board if such member no longer holds the elective or appointive office which made him or her eligible for appointment
to such board. The term of office of an elected official appointed to serve as a member of the governing board of a community service board shall be the same as such official’s elective term of office. The term
of office of an appointed official appointed to serve as a member of such governing board shall be the same as that of other members of such governing board; and

As used in this paragraph, the term “in-kind financial contribution” means the most current dollar value of any physical facilities or buildings and equipment, including vehicles, of all kinds provided at no cost by the county governing authority for
use by the community service board.

Each community service board in existence on June 30, 2014, shall reconstitute the membership of its governing board in accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, effective July 1, 2014.

A community service board which increases or reduces the number of its members of its governing board in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection shall revise its bylaws adopted in accordance with subsection (h) of this Code section to
reflect such increases or reductions. A community service board which reduces the number of members of its governing board shall designate which position or positions are to be eliminated and shall make reasonable efforts
to eliminate any position or positions of governing board members whose terms expire on or before June 30, 2014; provided, however, that members serving on the governing board of a community service board whose terms
do not expire on or before June 30, 2014, shall continue to serve out the terms of office to which they were appointed, regardless of whether this causes a governing board to temporarily exceed the maximum number of
members. Any additional positions created in conformity with such paragraphs (2) and (3) may be filled on July 1, 2014, and the governing authority of a county that is otherwise authorized to appoint such additional
member or members to the governing board of a community service board may do so no sooner than May 1, 2014, but any person so appointed shall not take office until July 1, 2014. If a position on such governing board
of the community service board is not filled on July 1, 2014, a vacancy in that position shall be deemed to have occurred on that date. A governing board of the community service board is authorized to make whatever
changes necessary in the terms of office of its members in order to achieve the staggering of terms required by subsection (h) of this Code section;

A person shall not be eligible to be appointed to or serve on a governing board of a community service board if such person is:

A member of the regional planning board which serves the region in which that community service board is located;

An employee or board member of a public or private entity which contracts with the department to provide mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases services within the community service board area served by that community service
board;

An employee of that community service board or employee or board member of any private or public group, organization, or service provider which contracts with or receives funds from that community service board; or

A former employee of that community service board until a period of at least two years has passed since the time such person was employed by that community service board.

A person shall not be eligible to be appointed to or serve on a governing board of a community service board if such person’s spouse, parent, child, or sibling is a member of that governing board or a member, employee, or board member specified in this
paragraph. With respect to appointments by the same county governing authority, no person who has served a full term or more on a governing board of a community service board may be appointed to a regional planning
board until a period of at least two years has passed since the time such person served on the governing board of a community service board, and no person who has served a full term or more on a regional planning
board may be appointed to the governing board of a community service board until a period of at least two years has passed since the time such person has served on the regional planning board; and

A governing board of a community service board created in accordance with this subsection shall reconstitute its governing board membership in conformity with the most recent United States decennial census in accordance with subparagraph (d)(2)(C) of
Code Section 1-3-1.

(b.1)
A county governing authority may appoint a member of the county board of health to serve on the governing board of the community service board provided that such person meets the qualifications of paragraph (1)
or (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section and such appointment does not violate the provisions of Chapter 10 of Title 45. For terms of office which begin July 1, 1994, or later, an employee of the Department of Human Resources
(now known as the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities for these purposes) or an employee of a county board of health shall not serve on a governing board of a community service board. For terms of
office which begin July 1, 2009, or later, an employee of the department, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, or the Department of Community Health or a board member of the respective boards of
each department shall not serve on a governing board of a community service board.

In making appointments to the governing board of a community service board, the county governing authorities shall ensure that such appointments are reflective of the cultural and social characteristics, including gender, race, ethnic, and age characteristics,
of the community service board area and county populations. The county governing authorities are further encouraged to ensure that each disability group is represented on the governing board of the community service board, and
in making such appointments the county governing authorities may consider suggestions from clinical professional associations as well as advocacy groups. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “advocacy groups” means any
organizations or associations that advocate for, promote, or have an interest in disability services and are exempted as a charitable organization from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;
provided, however, that “advocacy groups” shall not mean paid providers of disability services or health services.

(c.1)
A county governing authority in making appointments to the governing board of a community service board shall take into consideration that at least one member of the governing board of a community service board
is an individual who is trained or certified in finance or accounting; provided, however, that if after a reasonable effort at recruitment there is no person trained or certified in finance or accounting within the community
service board area who is willing and able to serve, the county governing authority may consider for appointment any other person having a familiarity with financial or accounting practices.

Each county in which the governing authority of the county is authorized to appoint members to the governing board of the community service board shall participate with the board in the operation of the program through the community service board. All
contractual obligations, including but not limited to real estate leases, rentals, and other property agreements, other duties, rights, and benefits of the mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases service
areas in existence on June 30, 2014, shall continue to exist along with the new powers granted to the community service boards effective July 1, 2014.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a community service board may be constituted in a method other than that outlined in subsection (b) of this Code section if:

A board of health of a county desiring to be the lead county board of health for that county submits a written agreement to the former Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases (now known as the Department of Behavioral
Health and Developmental Disabilities) of the former Department of Human Resources before July 1, 1993, to serve as the community service board and to continue providing disability services in that county after July 1,
1994, and the governing authority for that county adopted a resolution stating its desire to continue the provision of disability services through its board of health after July 1, 1994, and submitted a copy of such resolution
to the former division before July 1, 1993; or

The lead county board of health for a community mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse service area, as designated by the former Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Addictive Diseases (now known as the Department
of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities) of the former Department of Human Resources on July 15, 1993, but which area excludes any county which meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection,
submitted a written agreement to the former division and to all counties within such service area to serve as the community service board for that area and to continue providing disability services after July 1,
1994, which agreement was submitted between July 31, 1993, and December 31, 1993; and

Each county governing authority which is within the service area of a lead county board of health which has submitted an agreement pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph adopted a resolution stating its desire to continue the provision of disability
services through such lead county board of health after July 1, 1994, and submitted a copy of that resolution to the former division, the regional board, and the lead county board of health between July 31, 1993,
and December 31, 1993; and

The lead county board of health qualifying as such under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection agrees in writing to appoint a director for mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse other than the director of the county board of health as
stipulated in Code Section 31-3-12.1, to appoint an advisory council on mental health, mental retardation, and substance abuse consisting of consumers, families of consumers, and representatives from each of the counties
within the boundaries of the community service board, and to comply with all other provisions relating to the delivery of disability services pursuant to this chapter.

If the conditions enumerated in subsection (e) of this Code section are not met prior to or on December 31, 1993, a community service board as provided in subsection (b) shall be established and appointed by January 31, 1994, to govern the provision of
disability services within the boundaries of the community service board. Such community service board shall have the authority to adopt bylaws and undertake organizational and contractual activities after January 31, 1994; provided,
however, that the community service board established pursuant to this Code section may not begin providing services to clients until July 1, 1994.

If a community service board is established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of this Code section, such community service board must operate as established at least until June 30, 1996; provided, however, that in each fiscal year following
June 30, 1996, the counties included under the jurisdiction of such a community service board may vote to reconstitute the community service board pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section by passage of
a resolution by a majority of the county governing authorities within the jurisdiction of the community service board prior to January 1, 1997, or each year thereafter.

The governing board of each community service board shall adopt bylaws and operational policies and guidelines in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. Those bylaws shall address governing board appointment procedures, initial terms of governing
board members, the staggering of terms, quorum, a mechanism for ensuring that consumers of disability services and family members of consumers constitute no less than 50 percent of the governing board members appointed pursuant
to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section, and a mechanism for ensuring equitable representation of the various disability groups. A quorum for the transaction of any business and for the exercise of any
power or function of the governing board of the community service board shall consist of a majority of the total number of filled governing board member positions appointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section. A vote
of the majority of such quorum shall be the act of the governing board of the community service board except where the bylaws of the community service board may require a greater vote. The regular term of office for each member
of the governing board of a community service board shall be three years. Vacancies on such governing board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. For purposes of this subsection, “equitable representation
of the various disability groups” means that consumers and family members of such consumers who constitute no less than 50 percent of the governing board members holding membership pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection
(b) of this Code section shall be appointed so as to assure that an equal number of such members to the fullest extent possible represents mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases interests.

The governing board of each community service board which is composed of members who are appointed thereto by the governing authority of only one county shall have a minimum of seven and no more than nine members, not including any additional members
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section, notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, which members in all other respects shall be appointed as provided in this
Code section.

No governing board member, officer, or employee of a community service board who has authority to take, direct others to take, recommend, or approve any personnel action shall take or threaten action against any employee of a community service board as
a reprisal for making a complaint or disclosing information concerning the possible existence of any activity constituting fraud, waste, or abuse in or relating to the programs, operations, or client services of the community service
board, to the governing board of the community service board, to a member of the General Assembly, or to the department unless the complaint was made or the information was disclosed with the knowledge that it was false or with
willful disregard for its truth or falsity. Any action taken in violation of this subsection shall give the public employee a right to have such action set aside in a proceeding instituted in the superior court.

A member of a governing board of a community service board who after notice that such member has failed to complete any required training prescribed by the department pursuant to paragraph (6) of Code Section 37-1-20 continues such failure for 30 days
may be removed from office by the remaining members of the governing board of the community service board.

A member of a governing board of a community service board may resign from office by giving written notice to the executive director of the community service board. The resignation is irrevocable after delivery to such executive director but shall become
effective upon the date on which the notice is received or on the effective date given by the member in the notice, whichever date is later. The executive director, upon receipt of the resignation, shall give notice of the resignation
to the remaining members of the governing board of the community service board and to the chief executive officer or governing authority of the county that appointed the member.

The office of a member of a governing board of a community service board shall be vacated upon such member’s resignation, death, or inability to serve due to medical infirmity or other incapacity, removal by the community service board as authorized in
this Code section, or upon such other reasonable condition as the community service board may impose under its bylaws.

Each member of the governing board of a community service board shall comply with the code of ethics for members of boards, commissions, and authorities as set forth in Code Section 45-10-3. A governing board member who fails to comply with such code
may be subject to removal from office by the remaining members of the governing board of the community service board or by the commissioner as authorized in Code Section 37-2-10. The governing board of the community service board
shall revise the bylaws of the community service board adopted in accordance with subsection (h) of this Code section to reflect the requirements of this subsection.

A member of the governing board of a community service board shall have a fiduciary responsibility to avoid any conflict of interest in a manner that is consistent with the declarations found in Code Section 45-10-2. When such governing board is to decide
an issue about which a member has an unavoidable conflict of interest, such member shall absent herself or himself from not only the vote, but also from any deliberation on such issue. Members of the governing board of a community
service board shall not use their positions to obtain employment with or contracts from the community service board, its funding sources, or its suppliers of goods and services for themselves, family members, or close associates.
Should such member desire such employment, such member shall first resign. No person who has served as a member of the governing board of a community service board may be employed by that community service board, either directly
or by contract, until a period of at least two years has passed since the time such person served as a member of the governing board of that community service board. A governing board member or a member of the governing board member’s
family may obtain disability or health services from the community service board in the ordinary course of the community service board’s provision of such disability or health services on the same terms and under the same conditions
applicable to any member of the public. An individual governing board member shall not exercise individual authority over the community service board’s operations, affairs, property, or personnel, except when such member’s action
is explicitly permitted by action of the governing board of the community service board by policy or by resolution. The governing board of the community service board shall revise the bylaws of the community service board adopted
in accordance with subsection (h) of this Code section to reflect the requirements of this subsection.

A member of a governing board of a community service board may not enter upon the duties of office until such member takes the following oath of office:

Click to view

STATE OF GEORGIA COUNTY OF I, , do solemnly swear or affirm that I will truly perform the duties of a member of the governing board of the Community Service Board to the best of my ability. I do further swear or affirm: (1) That I am not the holder of
any unaccounted for public money due this state or any political subdivision or authority thereof; (2) That I am not the holder of any office of trust under the government of the United States, any other state, or any foreign state
which I am by the laws of the State of Georgia prohibited from holding; (3) That I am otherwise qualified to hold said office according to the Constitution and the laws of Georgia; and (4) That I will support the Constitution of the
United States and this state. Signature of member of the governing board of the Community Service Board Typed name of member of the governing board of the Community Service Board Sworn and subscribed before me this day of , . (SEAL)

History.
Code 1933, § 88-607, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1213, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 437, § 4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, §§ 1-7, 2-3; Ga. L. 2006, p. 310,
§ 5/HB 1223; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-22/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 4/SB 349; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 37/HB 737; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 5-2/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (a), added “to children and adults” at the end of the first sentence and added “for children and adults” at the end of the second sentence.

Cross references.

Complaints or information from public employees as to fraud, waste, and abuse in state programs and operations, § 45-1-4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, the second division (b)(3)(C)(vii), as added by Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 4/SB 349, was redesignated as division (b)(3)(C)(viii).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 10/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or abate any right accrued or vested prior to July 1, 2006, or any action or proceeding commenced prior to July 1,
2006, under any law amended or repealed by this Act.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 310, § 11/HB 1223, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that those provisions of that Act which authorize community service boards to amend their bylaws and authorize county governing authorities to appoint no sooner than May
1, 2006, any community service board members to take office on July 1, 2006, shall become effective April 21, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).